Washington statutes.
RCW 15.08.020

Methods of prevention, control and disinfection.

The following methods shall be used for the prevention, control or disinfection of pests and diseases:

(1) Bacterial diseases, removal and destruction of infected plant or part thereof, care being used to disinfect removal tools to prevent infection therefrom;

(2) Fungus diseases, spraying with effective fungicide;

(3) Chewing or sucking insect pests, spraying with effective insecticide;

(4) Fungus insect pests, spraying with other effective solutions or emulsions described in circulars issued by the director.

[ 1961 c 11 s 15.08.020. Prior: 1923 c 37 s 3, part; 1921 c 141 s 4, part; 1915 c 166 s 5, part; RRS s 2843, part.]